Tennessee, session 114, HB2128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
37-1-1001.
(a) Children have equal protection under the law and possess fundamental
rights to safety, protection from harm, and consideration of their best interests as the
paramount concern in all legal proceedings, governmental actions, and policy decisions
affecting their welfare.
(b) Every child has the inalienable right to be protected from physical, sexual,
emotional, and psychological abuse, neglect, and exploitation. A child shall not be
knowingly placed in the custody, care, or unsupervised contact of any person with a
documented history of child abuse, domestic violence, or other conduct that poses a
substantial risk of harm to the child.
37-1-1002.
(a) Children have the right to:
(1) Legal representation by qualified counsel in all proceedings
substantially affecting their welfare, custody, or placement that does not include
an agent of the court;
(2) Have their views and preferences considered in an age-appropriate
manner;
HB2128
012320
- 1 -

(3) Express their concerns about their safety and living situation without
fear of retaliation; and
(4) Timely resolution of legal proceedings affecting their welfare.
(b) Courts and judges shall:
(1) Consider the child's safety, well-being, and best interests as the
paramount concern in all decisions;
(2) Consider all available evidence regarding risks to the child's safety,
including, but not limited to, criminal history, protective services records, medical
evidence, and expert testimony. In any proceeding involving a child-impact
determination, expert testimony relating to the safety, health, well-being, or
development of a child must be admitted only if the professional has
demonstrated, subject-matter-specific clinical and professional expertise directly
related to the opinions offered. Such expertise shall not be based solely on
forensic experience, and qualifications shall be evaluated under Rule 702 of the
Tennessee Rules of Evidence; and
(3) Provide clear justification when placing a child with a caregiver
against the recommendations of child protective services, a guardian ad litem, or
other child welfare professionals.
37-1-1003.
Any violation of a child's rights under this section constitutes a deprivation of
constitutional rights under color of law. A child, through the child's representative, has
standing to seek judicial relief for violations of rights guaranteed by this part. This
section does not limit other protections afforded to children under law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012320